Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-183
Vehicle identification inspections; inspectors; certificate required; issuance.

No person shall conduct an inspection unless he or she is the holder of a current certificate of training issued by the patrol. The certificate of training shall be issued upon completion of a course of instruction, approved by the patrol, in the identification of stolen and altered vehicles. The superintendent may require an individual to take such additional training as he or she deems necessary in order to maintain a current certificate of training.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 83.